Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.180

Council—Ordinances—Recording.

No ordinance, resolution, or order, including those granting a franchise or valuable privilege, shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative vote of at least a majority of the members of the city or town council. Every ordinance or resolution adopted shall be signed by the mayor or two members, filed with the clerk within two days and by him or her recorded.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2030; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.180. Prior: 1959 c 76 s 3; 1943 c 271 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-20.]